Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.46.030

Place where committed.

Any harassment offense committed as set forth in RCW 9A.46.020 or 9A.46.110 may be deemed to have been committed where the conduct occurred or at the place from which the threat or threats were made or at the place where the threats were received.

[ 1992 c 186 s 3; 1985 c 288 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1992 c 186: See note following RCW 9A.46.110.